Tennessee, session 114, SB0577.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-2005(d)(2)(D), is amended by
deleting the language "seven (7) days" and substituting instead the language "five (5) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0577
002477
- 1 -